Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-632
Petition; removal of name; procedure.

(1) Any person may remove his or her name from a petition by signing and delivering a written letter to the Secretary of State, election commissioner, or county clerk. Name removal letters shall be filed with the following officers:

(a) For initiative and referendum petitions, new political party petitions, and petitions for President of the United States, with the Secretary of State;

(b) For candidate petitions, with the filing officer prescribed in section 32-607;

(c) For recall petitions, with the filing officer prescribed in section 32-1301; and

(d) For all other petitions, with the applicable election commissioner, county clerk, or city clerk.

(2) The name removal letter shall be delivered to and received by the officer prescribed in subsection (1) of this section by the following deadlines:

(a) For initiative and referendum petitions, by the deadline for filing petitions pursuant to section 32-1407;

(b) For new political party petitions, prior to or on the day the petition is filed for verification with the Secretary of State;

(c) For petitions for President of the United States, prior to or on the day the petition is filed for verification with the Secretary of State;

(d) For candidate petitions, prior to or on the day the petition is filed for verification with the filing officer;

(e) For recall petitions, by the deadline for filing petitions prescribed by section 32-1305; and

(f) For all other petitions, prior to or on the day the petition is filed for verification with the election commissioner, county clerk, or city clerk.

(3) The Secretary of State, election commissioner, or county clerk shall verify the signature in the letter with the signature appearing in the voter registration records.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 200;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 67;

Laws 2011, LB499, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 35;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 55.